Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.820

Nonrecognition of foreign order—Incompatibility with public policy.

(1) Washington's courts, administrative agencies, or any other Washington tribunal shall not recognize, base any ruling on, or enforce any order issued under foreign law, or by a foreign legal system, that is manifestly incompatible with public policy.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, a foreign law, an order issued by a foreign legal system or foreign tribunal is presumed manifestly incompatible with public policy, when it does not, or would not, grant the parties all of the same rights, or when the enforcement of any order would result in a violation of any right, guaranteed by the Washington state and United States Constitutions.

[ 2015 c 214 s 61.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Conflict with federal requirements—Waiver—2015 c 214: See notes following RCW 26.21A.010.

Denial of waiver—2015 c 214: See note following RCW 26.21A.115.